Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1224
Right-of-way, defined.

Right-of-way means the area on, below, or above a public roadway, highway, street, sidewalk, alley, dedicated utility easement, or similar property, but not including a freeway as defined in section 39-1302, the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, or a private easement.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 24.